Hawaii statutes.
[§163D-5] Hawaii agribusiness plan.
(a) The corporation shall prepare the Hawaii agribusiness plan which shall
define and establish goals, objectives, policies, and priority guidelines for
its agribusiness development strategy. The plan shall include but not be
limited to:

(1) An inventory of agricultural lands with suitable
adequate water resources that are or will become available due to the
downsizing of the sugar and pineapple industries that can be used to meet
present and future agricultural production needs;

(2) An inventory of agricultural infrastructure that
will be abandoned by sugar and pineapple industries such as irrigation systems,
drainage systems, processing facilities, and other accessory facilities;

(3) An analysis of imported agricultural products and
the potential for increasing local production to replace imported products in a
manner that complements existing local producers and increases Hawaii's
agricultural self-sufficiency;

(4) Alternatives in the establishment of sound financial
programs to promote the development of diversified agriculture;

(5) Feasible strategies for the promotion, marketing,
and distribution of Hawaii agricultural products in local, national, and
international markets;

(6) Programs to promote and facilitate the absorbing
of displaced agricultural workers into alternative agricultural enterprises;

(7) Strategies to insure the provision of adequate
air and surface transportation services and supporting facilities to support
the agricultural industry in meeting local, national, and international market
needs;

(8) Proposals to improve the gathering of data and
the timely presentation of information on market demands and trends that can be
used to plan future harvests and production; and

(9) Strategies for federal and state legislative
actions that will promote the development and enhancement of Hawaii's
agricultural industries.

(b) The corporation shall revise the Hawaii
agribusiness plan from time to time and shall incorporate the plan in its
annual report to the governor and the legislature as provided in section
163D-19. [L 1994, c 264, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next